Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-141
Registrar's records; available for inspection; when.

The records of ownership of fully registered bonds maintained by a registrar shall not be deemed to be public records and shall be available for inspection solely pursuant to a court order or a subpoena of any governmental agency having jurisdiction to issue such subpoena or in accordance with the bond ordinance governing the fully registered bonds.

Laws 1983, LB 421, § 8.